Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3030.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 401 of Title 51, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. No elected or appointed public official shall be required
or allowed to sign any type of nondisclosure agreement with respect
to a matter involving the performance of duties by the public
official.
B. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to a
nondisclosure agreement that a person is requested or required to
Req. No. 14693 Page 1

sign with respect to a matter which is personal or related to
litigation or potential litigation which does not involve the
performance of any duty imposed directly upon the person because of
the appointed or elected office the person occupies.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14693 MAH 01/06/26

















Req. No. 14693 Page 2